Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 5

Sequatchie Valley Educational Development Agency

64-1-501. Creation — Purpose.

There is created the Sequatchie Valley educational development agency, being a public body corporate and politic and referred to as the “agency” in this part.

The agency is created for the purpose of developing the field of education for the region covered by Bledsoe, Marion, Rhea, Grundy, and Sequatchie counties, referred to as the “region” in this part.

The scope of the agency's interests, work, and activities includes programs in the field of education.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 1; T.C.A., §66-1-501; Acts 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 1992, ch. 717, § 3; 2020, ch. 664, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Sequatchie Valley educational development agency, created by this section and §64-1-502, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§4-29-112,4-29-247.

Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 11 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, the Sequatchie Valley planning and development agency terminates and ceases to exist on April 2, 2020. All directors serving on the Sequatchie Valley planning and development agency on April 1, 2020 may continue to serve on the Sequatchie Valley educational development agency until their terms expire.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “There is created the Sequatchie Valley educational development agency” for “There is hereby created and established the Sequatchie Valley planning and development agency” in (a); in (b), substituted “created for the purpose of developing the field of education for the region” for “created and established for the purpose of planning and developing the resources of the region” and deleted “, including the coordination of the agency's planning and development work with related activities and programs of other federal, state and local planning and development agencies” at the end; and rewrote (c), which read: “(c) The scope of the agency's interests, work and activities shall include programs in the fields of education, public health, industrial development, highways, water resources and recreation and in such other fields as the agency's board of directors finds that it can provide planning and development services for the five-county region efficiently and economically.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 12. April 2, 2020.

64-1-502. Board of directors — Officers — Meetings — Expenses — Removal.

The agency shall be governed by a board of directors, referred to as the “board” in this part, consisting of the following members, to serve until their successors are appointed:

The county mayor of each of Bledsoe, Marion, Rhea, Grundy and Sequatchie counties shall during that county mayor's term as county mayor be a member of the board, or the county mayor may designate another person from that county to serve as member for the term that the county mayor would otherwise serve;

The governor shall appoint from each of the counties mentioned in subdivision (a)(1)(A) to be a member of the board a person active in county, municipal or other public or business, labor or agricultural affairs. The term of each such member shall be six (6) years, except for the original terms, which shall be for two (2), four (4) and six (6) years, beginning with the date of the organizational meeting of the board as provided in subsection (b);

The mayors of the incorporated cities and towns in each of the five (5) counties shall designate by majority vote one (1) member of the board of directors. The terms of these five (5) members of the board shall be six (6) years, beginning with the date of the organizational meeting of the board as provided in subsection (b); and

The governor shall designate a member of the governor's staff or cabinet to serve as a director during the governor's term of office.

Any vacancy in the board shall be filled in the same manner as provided in subdivision (a)(1); provided, that any such appointment or designation to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired portion of the term of the director being replaced.

Upon completion of the membership of the board, the directors shall meet and organize by electing a chair, vice chair and secretary-treasurer and shall set a regular time and place for meetings of the board thereafter.

The directors shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

A member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the board.

The presiding officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of the member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(129); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., §66-1-502; Acts 1985, ch. 136, § 2; 1992, ch. 717, §§ 4, 5; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2020, ch. 664, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The Sequatchie Valley educational development agency, created by this section and §64-1-501, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§4-29-112,4-29-247.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 11 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, the Sequatchie Valley planning and development agency terminates and ceases to exist on April 2, 2020. All directors serving on the Sequatchie Valley planning and development agency on April 1, 2020 may continue to serve on the Sequatchie Valley educational development agency until their terms expire.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 12. April 2, 2020.

64-1-503. General powers and duties.

The agency has the following general powers, functions, and duties:

Perpetual succession in the corporate name;

Sue and be sued in the corporate name;

Adopt, use, and alter a corporate seal, which is judicially noticed;

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with federal, state, and local governments, and other agencies, with private individuals, corporations, associations, and other organizations as the board deems necessary in carrying out the purposes of this part;

Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws;

Appoint managers, officers, employees, attorneys, and agents as the board deems necessary for the transaction of business, fix the appointees' compensation, and, if the board determines necessary, require bonds from the appointees;

Receive and expend funds from any source for staffing and other administrative expenses, research, planning, coordination, and other activities deemed necessary to promote the efficient educational development of the region; and

Receive grants from private foundations and other sources for the purposes of research and for demonstration projects oriented to human, physical, and natural resources utilization;

Coordinate its activities with federal agencies having responsibility for developing natural, human, and physical resources of the region and cooperate with the agencies in developing such resources;

Cooperate with local and regional financial institutions in assembling financial resources for educational development; and

Acquire by purchase, lease, or gift real and personal property, or any interest therein, that the board deems necessary in carrying out the purposes of this part.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 3; T.C.A., §66-1-503; Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 7; 2020, ch. 664, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act, which rewrote subdivision (14), shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “which is judicially” for “which shall be judicially” in (3); in (4), deleted “such” preceding “contracts”, substituted “governments, and other agencies” for “governments, and agencies thereof”, and “board deems necessary in carrying” for “board may deem necessary or convenient in carrying”; rewrote (6), (7)(A), (8), (9) and (10) which read: “(6) Appoint such managers, officers, employees, attorneys and agents as the board deems necessary for the transaction of its business, fix their compensation, define their duties and require bonds of such of them as the board may determine; (7)(A) Receive and expend funds from any source for staffing and other administrative expenses, research, planning, coordination, economic development, demonstration projects and other activities deemed necessary to promote the efficient, harmonious and economic development of the region; (8) Cooperate and coordinate its activities with local and state planning agencies and other areas in developing and implementing plans for development; (9) Cooperate and coordinate its activities with the federal agencies having responsibility for developing natural, human and physical resources of the region; (10) Cooperate with local and regional financial institutions in assembling financial resources for commercial, industrial and other development;”; and deleted (11)-(15) which read: “(11) Compile, prepare, publish and disseminate information about the economic resources of the region and about subareas; (12) Encourage and assist in the creation of private and semi-public, nonprofit organizations as needed and under existing laws of the state for carrying out specific projects and programs initiated under federal and state laws; (13) Enter into compacts or contractual arrangements with planning agencies of other adjoining or neighboring states, for the purpose of preparing joint comprehensive plans for development of a broader area or region; (14) Acquire by purchase, lease or gift any real and personal property, or any interest therein, that the board deems necessary or convenient in carrying out the purposes of this part; and (15) Have and exercise such other authority as deemed necessary by the board to further and promote the orderly and economic development of the region.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 12. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

64-1-504. [Repealed.]

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., §66-1-504; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 6, effective April 2, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former §61-1-504 concerned powers and duties with respect to planning and designation of the region as a planning region.

64-1-505. [Repealed.]

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 5; T.C.A., §66-1-505; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 7, effective April 2, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former §61-1-505 concerned construction and operation of public works projects.

64-1-506. Construction and operation of regional facilities.

Without derogating from any of its powers, duties, functions and responsibilities as set forth in the other provisions of this part, the agency is specifically authorized to:

Make plans for the construction, operation, and maintenance of regional educational facilities in one (1) or more of the five (5) counties constituting the region; and

Take all such actions as are necessary or convenient in the judgment of the board in effectuating such plans, including, but without limitation, by reason of this enumeration:

The acquisition of sites for the facilities;

Sale or transfer of such sites, if acquired in the agency's name, to the agency or institution that will own and operate the facility;

Arranging for the financing of the facility's construction, operation and maintenance;

Applying for such federal assistance as may be available and obligating the agency as required to obtain such assistance; and

Making contracts and agreements with federal, state and local educational agencies and institutions in carrying out this section.

The agency may, at the request of the counties, act as a vehicle for contracts or agreements among counties for carrying out regional projects.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 6; T.C.A., §66-1-506; Acts 1985, ch. 136, § 3; 1992, ch. 717, § 6; 2020, ch. 664, § 8.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “regional educational facilities” for “facilities, including, but not limited to, educational and recreational facilities” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 12. April 2, 2020.

64-1-507. Issuance of bonds — Securing of bonds.

The agency is authorized and empowered to issue its bonds from time to time in an amount not to exceed a total of two million dollars ($2,000,000) outstanding at any time for the purpose of paying in whole or in part the cost of acquiring lands or interests in land and of constructing facilities and improvements on the land as authorized in this part.

The agency is authorized to secure such bonds by a pledge of all or any of the revenues that may come to the agency from any source, by a mortgage or deed of trust of the agency's land or any part thereof, including improvements thereon, or by a combination of the two (2).

The agency is also authorized to enter into such contracts and to make such covenants in the issuance of its bonds as may be necessary to assure the marketability of the bonds.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 7; T.C.A., §66-1-507.

64-1-508. Authority to contribute money and issue bonds.

The various counties, towns and incorporated municipalities in the region are hereby authorized and empowered to:

Contribute to the work of the agency any amount or amounts of money that their respective governing bodies, acting in their sole discretion, approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective county or city. County legislative bodies and governing bodies of the cities or towns are empowered to levy and collect ad valorem taxes for purposes that are hereby declared to be for municipal and county public purposes; and

Issue their bonds as provided in title 9, chapter 21 to obtain funds for the financing of projects undertaken by the agency or to secure advances made by federal agencies for the construction of projects in the region pursuant to agreements with the agency.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., §66-1-508; Acts 1989, ch. 403, § 4; 2020, ch. 664, § 9.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment by ch. 664 substituted “projects” for “public works projects” in two places in (2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 12. April 2, 2020.

64-1-509. Annual reports.

The board of directors of the agency shall report annually to the governor, and to the governing bodies of the various counties, towns and incorporated municipalities of the region. The reports shall include a statement of financial receipts and expenditures and a summary of all activities and accomplishments for the period and proposed plans for the next year.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 9; T.C.A., §66-1-509.

64-1-510. Cooperation from state agencies.

All agencies of the state are hereby authorized and directed to extend their cooperation and lend assistance to the agency in the formulation and implementation of its planning and development program.

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 10; T.C.A., §66-1-510.

64-1-511. [Repealed.]

Acts 1968, ch. 460, § 11; T.C.A., §66-1-511; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 664, § 10, effective April 2, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former §64-1-511, concerned the advisory board.